District of Columbia statutes.
6-1406

Penalties.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any person who violates any of the provisions of the Construction Codes or orders issued under the authority of the Construction Codes shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine not to exceed $2000, or imprisonment not to exceed 90 days, or both, for each violation.

(b)

Any person who violates any of the provisions of the Fire Prevention Code, Articles 14, 15, and 17 of the Building Code, Article 9 of the Existing Structures Code, or orders issued under the authority of these provisions shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine not to exceed $2000, or imprisonment not to exceed 90 days, or both, for each violation.

(c)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed, in addition to other available remedies, for any infraction of the provisions of the Construction Codes, including the provisions of the Fire Prevention Code, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 (“Civil Infractions Act”). Adjudication of any infraction shall be pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(d)

Prosecutions pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 7, 34 DCR 1072
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 30, 38 DCR 314
Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-24, § 2(a), 52 DCR 8080

Cross References

Smoke detector violations, election of remedies, see § 6-751.09.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-751.09.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-1306.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-24, in subsec. (a), substituted “$300” for “$2000” and substituted “10 days” for “90 days”; in subsec. (b), substituted “$300” for “$2000”; in subsec. (c), substituted “may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction” for “may be imposed, in addition to other available remedies, for any infraction”; and added subsec. (d).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Abatement of Nuisance Construction Projects Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-4, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5427).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Abatement of Nuisance Construction Projects Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-42, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3045).